Utah statutes.
31A-9-603.   Exemption of fraternal benefits.
No money or other benefit, charity, relief, or aid to be paid, provided, or
rendered by any domestic or nondomestic fraternal is liable to attachment,
garnishment, or other process, or may be seized, taken, appropriated, or
applied by any legal or equitable process or operation of law to pay a debt or
liability of a member or beneficiary, or any other person who may have a right
to them, either before or after their payment by the fraternal.
